District of Columbia statutes.
7-1541.05a

Authority of organ procurement organization acting on behalf of eye bank or tissue bank.

An organ procurement organization may screen, test, or recover eyes or tissues on behalf of an eye bank or tissue bank.

History

Sept. 10, 1962, 76 Stat. 537, Pub. L. 87-656, § 9a
as added Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 30(e)(4), 55 DCR 2532